Tennessee, session 114, SB0865.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-2-904(a), is amended by deleting
the language "no later than June 1" wherever it appears and substituting "no later than July 1".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0865
002579
- 1 -